Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-343
Funds; use.

All funds made available by law, including funds already collected for state park purposes, shall be used only in the development and administration of the state park system.

Laws 1959, c. 436, § 8, p. 1466;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-815.28;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 101.